Louisiana, session 2026, SB31.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2116.1(B)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2116.1. Nursing facilities; facility need review; moratorium; exceptions
* * *
B.(1) There shall be a moratorium on nursing facilities and additional beds
for nursing facilities which shall be in effect until July 1, 2027 2032.
* * *